Vermont, session 2025-2026, S280.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 4152a is added to read:
§ 4152a. PROPERTY TAX CLASSIFICATIONS
(a) The grand list of a town shall include one or more tax classifications for
each parcel of real estate. A parcel shall be classified using one of the general
VT LEG #385842 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.280
2026 Page 2 of 9
classes of real estate listed under subsection (b) of this section and based on the
considerations set forth in this section and guidance provided by the Division
of Property Valuation and Review. The listers and assessors shall annually
update the grand list to include a tax classification not later than June 1 of
every year, using information submitted to the Department of Taxes pursuant
to this section. The tax classification may be updated after June 1 when a
taxpayer files a, or corrects an erroneously filed, homestead declaration after
June 1.
(b) A parcel shall be assigned one or more of the following general classes:
(1) homestead;
(2) nonhomestead nonresidential;
(3) nonhomestead residential; and
(4) nonhomestead seasonal.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) “Homestead” means a parcel, or portion of a parcel, declared as a
homestead on or before October 15 in accordance with section 5410 of this
title for the current year.
(2) “Nonhomestead nonresidential” means a parcel, or portion of a
parcel, that does not qualify as “homestead” or “nonhomestead residential”
under this section.
VT LEG #385842 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.280
2026 Page 3 of 9
(3) “Nonhomestead residential” means a parcel, or portion of a parcel,
for which a homestead was not declared in accordance with section 5410 of
this title for the current year and that has a residential property, as defined by
the Commissioner by rule.
(4) “Nonhomestead seasonal” means a parcel, or portion of a parcel, that
would qualify as “nonhomestead residential,” except the parcel has no
residential property fit for habitation on a year-round basis. The
Commissioner shall adopt rules further defining residential property fit for
habitation on a year-round basis.
(d) A parcel with two or more portions qualifying for different tax
classifications under this section shall be classified proportionally based on the
percentage of floor space used.
(1) In the case of a homestead with 25 percent or less of floor space used
for a business purpose, the parcel shall be classified as a homestead pursuant to
subdivision 5401(7)(F) of this title.
(2) If a portion of floor space is used for more than one purpose, the use
for which the floor space is most often used shall be considered the primary
use, and the floor space shall be dedicated to that use for purposes of tax
classification.
VT LEG #385842 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.280
2026 Page 4 of 9
(e) The Commissioner shall amend existing forms, and publish new forms,
as needed to gather the necessary attestations and declarations required under
this section.
(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the tax treatment or
enrollment eligibility of property as it relates to use value appraisal under
chapter 124 of this title.
(g) Persons aggrieved by a decision to classify property for taxation
purposes under this section may appeal in the manner provided for property
valuation appeals under this title.
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 4152 is amended to read:
§ 4152. CONTENTS
(a) When completed, the grand list of a town shall be in such form as the
Director prescribes and shall contain such information as the Director
prescribes, including:
(1) In alphabetical order, the name of each real property owner and each
owner of taxable personal property.
(2) The last known mailing address of all such owners.
(3) A brief description of each parcel of taxable real estate in the town,
including a classification assigned pursuant to section 4152a of this title.
“Parcel” As used in this subdivision, “parcel” means a separate and sellable lot
VT LEG #385842 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.280
2026 Page 5 of 9
or piece of real estate. Parcels may be combined to represent all contiguous
land in the same ownership, together with all improvements thereon.
* * *
Sec. 3. 32 V.S.A. § 5402 is amended to read:
§ 5402. EDUCATION PROPERTY TAX LIABILITY
(a) A statewide education tax is imposed on all nonhomestead and
homestead property at the following rates:
(1) The tax rate for nonhomestead nonresidential and nonhomestead
seasonal property shall be $1.59 per $100.00 divided by the statewide
adjustment.
(2) The tax rate for homestead property shall be $1.00 multiplied by the
education property tax spending adjustment for the municipality per $100.00 of
equalized education property value as most recently determined under section
5405 of this title. The homestead property tax rate for each municipality that is
a member of a union or unified union school district shall be calculated as
required under subsection (e) of this section.
(3) The tax rate for nonhomestead residential property shall be $2.00
multiplied by the education property tax spending adjustment for the
municipality per $100.00 of equalized education property value as most
recently determined under section 5405 of this title. The Commissioner of
Taxes shall determine a nonhomestead residential education tax rate for each
VT LEG #385842 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.280
2026 Page 6 of 9
municipality that is a member of a union or unified union school district using
the same process as is used for homesteads under subsection (e) of this section.
Nonhomestead residential property shall use the same property dollar
equivalent yield as homesteads in the same municipality.
* * *
Sec. 4. 32 V.S.A. § 5402b is amended to read:
§ 5402b. STATEWIDE EDUCATION TAX YIELDS;
RECOMMENDATION OF THE COMMISSIONER
(a) Annually, not later than December 1, the Commissioner of Taxes, after
consultation with the Secretary of Education, the Secretary of Administration,
and the Joint Fiscal Office, shall calculate and recommend a property dollar
equivalent yield, an income dollar equivalent yield, and a nonhomestead
property tax rate for the following fiscal year. In making these calculations,
the Commissioner shall assume:
* * *
(4) the percentage change in the average education tax bill applied to
nonhomestead nonresidential property and, the percentage change in the
average education tax bill applied to nonhomestead seasonal property, the
percentage change in the average education tax bill applied to nonhomestead
residential property, the percentage change in the average education tax bill of
homestead property, and the percentage change in the average education tax
VT LEG #385842 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.280
2026 Page 7 of 9
bill for taxpayers who claim a credit under subsection 6066(a) of this title are
equal;
* * *
Sec. 5. 16 V.S.A. § 3444 is added to read:
§ 3444. SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION AID SPECIAL FUND
(a) Creation. There is created the School Construction Aid Special Fund,
to be administered by the Agency of Education. Monies in the Fund shall be
used for the purposes of:
(1) awarding aid to school construction projects under section 3448 of
this title;
(2) awarding grants through the Facilities Master Plan Grant Program
established in section 3441 of this title;
(3) funding administrative costs of the State Aid for Capital
Construction Costs program; and
(4) awarding emergency aid under section 3448 of this title.
(b) Funds. The Fund shall consist of:
(1) half of the revenue generated by education property tax imposed on
nonhomestead residential properties;
(2) any amounts transferred or appropriated to it by the General
Assembly; and
(3) any interest earned by the Fund.
VT LEG #385842 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.280
2026 Page 8 of 9
Sec. 6. 16 V.S.A. § 4025 is amended to read:
§ 4025. EDUCATION FUND
(a) The Education Fund is established to comprise the following:
(1) all revenue paid to the State from the statewide education tax on
nonhomestead and homestead property under 32 V.S.A. chapter 135, except
revenue deposited in the School Construction Aid Special Fund pursuant to
subdivision 3444(b)(1) of this title;
* * *
Sec. 7. PROPERTY TAX CLASSIFICATIONS; TRANSITION; DATA
COLLECTION
(a) For calendar year 2027, the Commissioner of Taxes shall amend and
create forms so that taxpayers report information on the use of their property
for such property to be classified as homestead, nonhomestead residential,
nonhomestead nonresidential, nonhomestead seasonal, or a proportional
classification of those uses. The information collected, and classifications
determined, shall align with the definitions and requirements of Sec. 1 of this
act. The Commissioner shall use the information to determine and assign a tax
classification for every grand list parcel and, on or before October 1, 2027, the
Commissioner shall provide that information to the Joint Fiscal Office.
(b) On or before August 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Taxes shall publish
guidance that interprets and explains the statutory definitions from Sec. 1 of
VT LEG #385842 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.280
2026 Page 9 of 9
this act, which shall serve as the Department’s official interpretation until the
Commissioner adopts rules relating to the property classification system
created by this act.
Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Sec. 7 (transition provisions) shall take effect on
passage.
(b) Secs. 1–6 (new property tax classifications and rates) shall take effect
on January 1, 2028.
VT LEG #385842 v.1